Maryland, session 2025, HB1158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–2502.
(a) A firearm industry member may not knowingly create, maintain, or contribute
to harm to the public through the sale, manufacture, distribution, importation, or
marketing of a firearm–related product by engaging in conduct that is:
(1) Unlawful; or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1158*

HOUSE BILL 1158
(2) Unreasonable under the totality of the circumstances.
(b) A firearm industry member shall establish and implement reasonable controls
regarding the sale, manufacture, distribution, importation, marketing, possession, and use
of the firearm industry member’s firearm–related products.
(c) A violation of this section is a public nuisance.
3–2503.
(a) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Attorney General, a
county attorney, or the Baltimore City Solicitor may bring an action against a firearm
industry member for a public nuisance caused by a violation of § 3–2502 of this subtitle.
(2) In an action brought under this subsection, the Attorney General,
county attorney, or Baltimore City Solicitor may seek:
(i) Injunctive relief;
(ii) Restitution;
(iii) Compensatory and punitive damages;
(iv) Reasonable attorney’s fees and costs; and
(v) Any other appropriate relief.
(B) (1) A PERSON MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR DAMAGES AGAINST A
FIREARM INDUSTRY MEMBER FOR INJURY OR LOSS SUSTAINED AS A RESULT OF A
VIOLATION OF § 3–2502 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A PERSON WHO BRINGS AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY
SEEK AND BE AWARDED:
(I) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(II) COMPENSATORY AND PUNITIVE DAMAGES; AND
(III) REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES AND COSTS.
(3) A PERSON WHO BRINGS AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION
SHALL, WITHIN 5 DAYS AFTER FILING THE COMPLAINT:
(I) NOTIFY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL THAT THE PERSON HAS
BROUGHT THE ACTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1158 3
(II) PROVIDE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL WITH A COPY OF THE
COMPLAINT AND ANY OTHER DOCUMENTS OR PLEADINGS FILED WITH THE
COMPLAINT.
[(b)] (C) A party seeking relief under this section is not required to prove that a
firearm industry member acted with the intent to violate this subtitle.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.